Maine, session 132, LD557.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§1-B is enacted to read:
1-B. All-terrain vehicle or ATV. "All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" means a motor-
driven, off-road, recreational vehicle capable of cross-country travel on land, snow, ice,
marsh, swampland or other natural terrain. "All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" includes, but is
not limited to, a multitrack, multiwheel or low-pressure-tire vehicle; an amphibious
machine; or other means of transportation deriving motive power from a source other than
muscle or wind. "All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" does not include an automobile, a
motorcycle, an electric personal assistive mobility device, a truck, a snowmobile as defined
in Title 12, section 13001, subsection 25, an airmobile as defined in Title 12, section 13001,
subsection 2, a construction or logging vehicle used in performance of its common
functions, a farm vehicle used for farming purposes or a vehicle used exclusively for
emergency, military, law enforcement or fire control purposes.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §101, sub-§42, ¶B, as amended by PL 2005, c. 577, §5, is
further amended to read:
B. An all-terrain vehicle as defined in Title 12, section 13001, unless the all-terrain
vehicle is permitted in accordance with section 501, subsection 8, is registered in
accordance with section 501, subsection 14 or is operated on a way and section 2080
or 2094 applies; and
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §102, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Operation of ATVs; beginning January 1, 2026. The registration and operation
of ATVs in accordance with section 501, subsection 14 and section 2094 are authorized
beginning January 1, 2026.
Sec. 4. 29-A MRSA §354, as amended by PL 2021, c. 216, §10, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 29-A MRSA §501, sub-§8, ¶E, as enacted by PL 1993, c. 683, Pt. A, §2
and affected Pt. B, §5, is amended to read:
E. Operation of an ATV permitted under this subsection is limited to agricultural
purposes in connection with a farm and to operation from or to the premises where
kept, from or to a farm lot or between farm lots used for farm purposes by the ATV
owner.
Sec. 6. 29-A MRSA §501, sub-§14 is enacted to read:
14. ATVs for public way use. The Secretary of State may issue a registration for an
ATV for use on a public way upon application and payment of the ATV registration fee
under Title 12, section 13155, subsection 5, paragraph A or paragraph B, subparagraph (2).
The registrant must provide a certificate of title required by section 651 and proof of
financial responsibility required by section 1601.
Sec. 7. 29-A MRSA §652, sub-§17, as amended by PL 2015, c. 88, §2, is further
amended to read:
17. Off-road vehicle. An off-road vehicle, not including an ATV registered pursuant
to section 501, subsection 14; and
Sec. 8. 29-A MRSA §1927 is enacted to read:
Page 1 - 132LR1114(01)

§1927. Equipment requirements for all-terrain vehicles operated on the road
1. Equipment required. An ATV registered pursuant to section 501, subsection 14
may not be less than 30 inches in width or more than 70 inches in width, measured at the
widest point of the ATV, including the tires, and must be equipped with:
A. Brakes for each wheel;
B. Two headlights that comply with section 1904;
C. A muffler and emission control system;
D. One rearview mirror on the left side;
E. A parking brake;
F. Rear reflectors;
G. A windshield, unless the operator wears eye protection while operating the ATV;
H. A speedometer, illuminated for nighttime operation;
I. One or more stop lamps on the rear;
J. Rear lights that comply with section 1905, including a light that is constructed and
placed to illuminate the registration plate in a white light;
K. For ATVs with side-by-side seating, a seat belt for each passenger that complies
with section 2081;
L. For ATVs designed by the manufacturer to carry one or more passengers, a seat
designed for passengers, including a footrest and handhold for each passenger;
M. Operational turn signal lamps, if part of the standard equipment;
N. Operational horn or other warning device, if part of the standard equipment;
O. Operational windshield wipers, if part of the standard equipment;
P. An operator's seat that is not less than 25 inches off the ground or more than 40
inches off the ground, measured from the ground to the top of the forward edge of the
seat when measured on a flat surface; and
Q. Tires with a tread depth that is at least 2/32 inch; the tires may not exceed 26 inches
in height or be larger than the tires the ATV manufacturer made available for that ATV
model.
2. Working condition. Equipment required in subsection 1 must be in good working
condition.
3. Rules. The Chief of the State Police shall adopt routine technical rules as described
in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A for the enforcement and administration of this
section.
Sec. 9. 29-A MRSA §2080, as amended by PL 2005, c. 577, §32, is further amended
to read:
§2080. Operation of all-terrain and off-road vehicles
Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, whenever an all-terrain
vehicle, except for an all-terrain vehicle registered pursuant to section 501, subsection 14,
Page 2 - 132LR1114(01)

319 or off-road vehicle is operated on a way, the vehicle and operator are subject to all
420 provisions of this Title, except chapters 5, 7, 13 and 15. Whenever an all-terrain vehicle or
431 off-road vehicle is operated on a way, the operator is not subject to the provisions of chapter
442 11, except when an all-terrain vehicle is permitted in accordance with section 501,
453 subsection 8 or registered pursuant to section 501, subsection 14.
Sec. 10. 29-A MRSA §2094 is enacted to read:
§2094. Operation of all-terrain vehicles
A person operating an ATV on a public way, except for an ATV permitted under
section 501, subsection 8, shall comply with the provisions of this chapter as they apply to
the operator of an automobile and with this section.
1. License required; maintenance of financial responsibility. A person operating
an ATV must possess a valid Class A, Class B or Class C driver's license pursuant to section
1252 and shall maintain the amounts of motor vehicle financial responsibility specified in
section 1605.
2. Registration required. An ATV operated on a public way must be registered under
section 501, subsection 14.
3. Public way restrictions. An ATV may be operated only on a public way where
the posted speed limit is 50 miles per hour or less. An ATV may cross, at an intersection,
a public way with a posted speed limit of more than 50 miles per hour.
A. The department, by routine technical rule as described in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A, may prohibit or restrict the operation of an ATV on any public way or
segment of a public way under its jurisdiction if it determines that the prohibition or
restriction is necessary in the interest of public safety.
B. A municipality or county may adopt an ordinance to prohibit or restrict the
operation of an ATV on any public way under its jurisdiction if it determines that the
prohibition or restriction is necessary in the interest of public safety, except that a
municipality or county may not prohibit or restrict the use of an ATV on a public way
where the use of an off-road vehicle is permitted.
4. Violation. A person who operates an ATV in violation of subsection 3 commits a
traffic infraction.
5. Rulemaking. The Secretary of State, in consultation with the Commissioner of
Transportation and the Commissioner of Public Safety, may adopt routine technical rules
in accordance with Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A to implement this section, monitor
the registration and use of ATVs and provide for the safe operation of ATVs.
Sec. 11. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2026.